North Carolina, session 2025, HB238.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to Buncombe County as a reimbursement for the
study of merging the Buncombe County School Administrative Unit and the City of Asheville
School Administrative Unit that was required by subsection (e) of Section 4 of S.L. 2023-128.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H238-v-1*